Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-705
Women's Health Initiative Fund; created; use; investment; termination.

The Women's Health Initiative Fund is created. The fund terminates on July 1, 2026. The fund shall consist of money received as gifts or grants or collected as fees or charges from any federal, state, public, or private source. Money in the fund shall be used to reimburse the expenses of the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska and expenses of members of the Women's Health Initiative Advisory Council. Nothing in sections 71-701 to 71-707 requires the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska to accept any private donations that are not in keeping with the goals and objectives set forth by the initiative and the Department of Health and Human Services. No funds expended or received by or through the initiative shall pay for abortion referral or abortion services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 480, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 451;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 33.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.